Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.091] MINNESOTA CIVIC SEAL DESIGNATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota Civic Seal designation is established for high school students who have demonstrated excellence in civics education and engagement. The purpose of this designation is to encourage civic learning, promote active participation in democratic institutions, and recognize students who have achieved a high level of civic knowledge, skills, and community involvement. new text end new text begin (b) A student must meet the following minimum criteria to be awarded the Minnesota Civic Seal: new text end new text begin (1) complete activities across multiple areas of civic competency, including democratic engagement, civic knowledge, media literacy, community service, and bridge building, with demonstrated proficiency in each area; new text end new text begin (2) complete a civics-related project that involves research, planning, and action on a community issue, resulting in measurable civic impact or engagement; and new text end new text begin (3) complete a reflection that evaluates the learning experience, impact, and personal growth gained from civic engagement activities. new text end new text begin (c) The criteria must be broad enough for any student in any region or community of the state to be able to earn the seal without having to spend personal resources to access the criteria or activity. No specific out-of-school or partisan civic program or provider shall be named or required as specific criteria. A school district or individual school must not be obligated to participate in offering or awarding a Minnesota Civic Seal designation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Civic Seal Task Force. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota Civic Seal Task Force is established to oversee the implementation and ongoing development of the Minnesota Civic Seal designation. The task force shall be led by the YMCA Center for Youth Voice. new text end new text begin (b) The task force membership must include: new text end new text begin (1) the Secretary of State or designee, who shall serve as chair; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of education or designee; new text end new text begin (3) at least two civic educators representing different regions of the state; new text end new text begin (4) at least two professional development providers with expertise in civics education; new text end new text begin (5) at least two high school students who have earned or are working toward the Minnesota Civic Seal; new text end new text begin (6) at least one representative from an institution of higher education; new text end new text begin (7) at least two civic engagement experts or representatives from nonprofit organizations focused on democracy education or youth civic engagement; and new text end new text begin (8) other members as determined appropriate by the Secretary of State. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall: new text end new text begin (1) establish and periodically review specific criteria and guidelines for awarding the Minnesota Civic Seal; new text end new text begin (2) provide guidance and support to all schools implementing the Minnesota Civic Seal designation; new text end new text begin (3) ensure the criteria remain broad and accessible to students from all regions and backgrounds; new text end new text begin (4) review and approve program implementation plans submitted by participating schools; new text end new text begin (5) promote awareness of the Minnesota Civic Seal designation among students, educators, and communities; and new text end new text begin (6) submit an annual report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education on program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for improvement. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (e) Members of the task force shall serve for a term of three years or until the member no longer meets the requirement of the role, whichever is sooner. new text end new text begin (f) The task force shall meet at least twice annually, with additional meetings as called by the chair. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin School participation. new text end new text begin (a) Participation is optional for any high school to offer the Minnesota Civic Seal designation. A school that offers or awards a Minnesota Civic Seal designation must: new text end new text begin (1) provide information to all secondary students regarding the opportunity to earn the Minnesota Civic Seal and the criteria for being awarded the recognition; and new text end new text begin (2) record the designation on the official transcript of each student who earns the Minnesota Civic Seal. new text end new text begin (b) A school must not charge a fee to a student or the student's family for participation in earning the Minnesota Civic Seal. new text end new text begin (c) A school must notify the task force of its intent to offer or award a Minnesota Civic Seal designation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Seal and recognition. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education must publish the Minnesota Civic Seal requirements adopted by the task force on the department's website. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may also provide additional materials to schools to recognize and celebrate students who achieve the Minnesota Civic Seal designation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2027-2028 academic school year and applies to students graduating in 2028 and later. new text end